Utah statutes.
4-3-4.   Authority to inspect premises.
(1)  The department may inspect any premises where dairy products are
produced, manufactured, processed, stored, or held for distribution, at
reasonable times and places, to determine whether the premises are in
compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted according to it.
(2)  If the department is denied access, it may proceed immediately to the
nearest court of competent jurisdiction to seek an ex parte warrant or its
equivalent to permit inspection of the premises.
